test/src/morphology/N-rakas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - rakas: # Noun 'borg' - full paradigm
     rakas+N+Sg+Nom: rakas
     rakas+N+Sg+Gen: rakkhaan
     rakas+N+Sg+Acc: rakkhaan
     rakas+N+Sg+Par: rakasta
     rakas+N+Sg+Tra: rakkhaaksi
     rakas+N+Sg+Abe: rakkhaatta
     rakas+N+Sg+Com: rakkhain
     rakas+N+Sg+Ine: rakkhassa
     rakas+N+Sg+Ela: rakkhasta
     rakas+N+Sg+Ill: rakkhaasseen
     rakas+N+Sg+Ade: rakkhaala
     rakas+N+Sg+Abl: rakkhaalta
     rakas+N+Sg+All: rakkhaale
     rakas+N+Sg+Ess: rakkhaana
     rakas+N+Pl+Nom: rakkhaat
     rakas+N+Pl+Gen: rakkhaitten
     rakas+N+Pl+Acc: rakkhat
     rakas+N+Pl+Par: rakkhaita
     rakas+N+Pl+Tra: rakkhaiksi
     rakas+N+Pl+Abe: rakkhaitta
     rakas+N+Pl+Com: rakkhain
     rakas+N+Pl+Ine: rakkhaissa
     rakas+N+Pl+Ela: rakkhaista
     rakas+N+Pl+Ill: rakkhaissiin
     rakas+N+Pl+Ade: rakkhaila
     rakas+N+Pl+Abl: rakkhailta
     rakas+N+Pl+All: rakkhaile
     rakas+N+Pl+Ess: rakkhaina
